California, session 20252026, AB1702.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5011.5 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:5011.5. (a) A veteran of a war in which the United States has been, or may be engaged, who is a resident of this state, upon presentation to the department of proof of disability, proof of being held captive as a prisoner of war, or proof of being a recipient of a Congressional Medal of Honor, and proof of an honorable discharge from service, upon application therefor, shall be issued a pass entitling the bearer to the use of all facilities, including boat launching facilities, in units of the state park system.(b) As used in this section: section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Veteran” means a former member of the Armed Forces of the United States who has a 50 percent or greater service-connected disability, or who was held as a prisoner of war by forces hostile to the United States, as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and who was honorably discharged from service.(2) “War” means that period of time commencing when Congress declares war or when the Armed Forces of the United States are engaged in active military operations against a foreign power, whether or not war has been formally declared, and ending upon the termination of hostilities as proclaimed by the President of the United States.SEC. 2. Section 5011.8 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:5011.8. A veteran, as defined in Section 980 of the Military and Veterans Code, or an active or reserve duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard of any state, upon presentation to the department of proof of their active or reserve duty status or proof of honorable discharge from service, shall be issued a discount pass entitling the bearer to 15 percent off the cost to use all facilities, including boat launching facilities, in units of the state park system.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________